Illinois, session 104th, SB2416.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 5-12020 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-12020)7    Sec. 5-12020. Commercial wind energy facilities and 8commercial solar energy facilities. 9    (a) As used in this Section:10    "Commercial operation date" means the calendar date the 11facility owner notifies the landowner, county, and Illinois 12Department of Agriculture in writing that commercial operation 13of a commercial solar energy facility or commercial wind 14energy facility has commenced. 15    "Commercial solar energy facility" means a "commercial 16solar energy system" as defined in Section 10-720 of the 17Property Tax Code. "Commercial solar energy facility" does not 18mean a utility-scale solar energy facility being constructed 19at a site that was eligible to participate in a procurement 20event conducted by the Illinois Power Agency pursuant to 21subsection (c-5) of Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power Agency 22Act. 23    "Commercial wind energy facility" means a wind energy   SB2416- 2 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1conversion facility of equal or greater than 500 kilowatts in 2total nameplate generating capacity. "Commercial wind energy 3facility" includes a wind energy conversion facility seeking 4an extension of a permit to construct granted by a county or 5municipality before January 27, 2023 (the effective date of 6Public Act 102-1123).7    "Facility owner" means (i) a person with a direct 8ownership interest in a commercial wind energy facility or a 9commercial solar energy facility, or both, regardless of 10whether the person is involved in acquiring the necessary 11rights, permits, and approvals or otherwise planning for the 12construction and operation of the facility, and (ii) at the 13time the facility is being developed, a person who is acting as 14a developer of the facility by acquiring the necessary rights, 15permits, and approvals or by planning for the construction and 16operation of the facility, regardless of whether the person 17will own or operate the facility.18    "Nonparticipating property" means real property that is 19not a participating property.20    "Nonparticipating residence" means a residence that is 21located on nonparticipating property and that is existing and 22occupied on the date that an application for a permit to 23develop the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial 24solar energy facility is filed with the county.25    "Occupied community building" means any one or more of the 26following buildings that is existing and occupied on the date   SB2416- 3 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1that the application for a permit to develop the commercial 2wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy facility 3is filed with the county: a school, place of worship, day care 4facility, public library, or community center.5    "Participating property" means real property that is the 6subject of a written agreement between a facility owner and 7the owner of the real property that provides the facility 8owner an easement, option, lease, or license to use the real 9property for the purpose of constructing a commercial wind 10energy facility, a commercial solar energy facility, or 11supporting facilities. "Participating property" also includes 12real property that is owned by a facility owner for the purpose 13of constructing a commercial wind energy facility, a 14commercial solar energy facility, or supporting facilities.15    "Participating residence" means a residence that is 16located on participating property and that is existing and 17occupied on the date that an application for a permit to 18develop the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial 19solar energy facility is filed with the county.20    "Protected lands" means real property that is: 21        (1) subject to a permanent conservation right 22    consistent with the Real Property Conservation Rights Act; 23    or 24        (2) registered or designated as a nature preserve, 25    buffer, or land and water reserve under the Illinois 26    Natural Areas Preservation Act.   SB2416- 4 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1    "Supporting facilities" means the transmission lines, 2substations, access roads, meteorological towers, storage 3containers, and equipment associated with the generation and 4storage of electricity by the commercial wind energy facility 5or commercial solar energy facility.6    "Wind tower" includes the wind turbine tower, nacelle, and 7blades. 8    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law or whether 9the county has formed a zoning commission and adopted formal 10zoning under Section 5-12007, a county may establish standards 11for commercial wind energy facilities, commercial solar energy 12facilities, or both. The standards may include all of the 13requirements specified in this Section but may not include 14requirements for commercial wind energy facilities or 15commercial solar energy facilities that are more restrictive 16than specified in this Section. A county may also regulate the 17siting of commercial wind energy facilities with standards 18that are not more restrictive than the requirements specified 19in this Section in unincorporated areas of the county that are 20outside the zoning jurisdiction of a municipality and that are 21outside the 1.5-mile radius surrounding the zoning 22jurisdiction of a municipality. 23    (c) If a county has elected to establish standards under 24subsection (b), before the county grants siting approval or a 25special use permit for a commercial wind energy facility or a 26commercial solar energy facility, or modification of an   SB2416- 5 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1approved siting or special use permit, the county board of the 2county in which the facility is to be sited or the zoning board 3of appeals for the county shall hold at least one public 4hearing. The public hearing shall be conducted in accordance 5with the Open Meetings Act and shall be held not more than 60 6days after the filing of the application for the facility. The 7county shall allow interested parties to a special use permit 8an opportunity to present evidence and to cross-examine 9witnesses at the hearing, but the county may impose reasonable 10restrictions on the public hearing, including reasonable time 11limitations on the presentation of evidence and the 12cross-examination of witnesses. The county shall also allow 13public comment at the public hearing in accordance with the 14Open Meetings Act. The county shall make its siting and 15permitting decisions not more than 60 30 days after the 16conclusion of the public hearing. Notice of the hearing shall 17be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the 18county. A facility owner must enter into an agricultural 19impact mitigation agreement with the Department of Agriculture 20prior to the date of the required public hearing. A commercial 21wind energy facility owner seeking an extension of a permit 22granted by a county prior to July 24, 2015 (the effective date 23of Public Act 99-132) must enter into an agricultural impact 24mitigation agreement with the Department of Agriculture prior 25to a decision by the county to grant the permit extension. 26Counties may allow test wind towers or test solar energy   SB2416- 6 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1systems to be sited without formal approval by the county 2board.3    (c-5) A commercial wind energy facility or commercial 4solar energy facility proposed to be located on property in an 5unincorporated area of the county within the zoning 6jurisdiction of a municipality and located adjacent to the 7corporate boundary of a municipality shall either be annexed 8to the municipality subject to the requirements under Section 97-1-1 of the Illinois Municipal Code or be subject to the 10municipality's zoning regulations. 11    (d) A county with an existing zoning ordinance in conflict 12with this Section shall amend that zoning ordinance to be in 13compliance with this Section within 120 days after January 27, 142023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1123).15    (e) A county may require: 16        (1) a wind tower of a commercial wind energy facility 17    to be sited as follows, with setback distances measured 18    from the center of the base of the wind tower:  19Setback Description           Setback Distance 20Occupied Community            2.1 times the maximum blade tip21Buildings                     height of the wind tower to the22                              nearest point on the outside23                              wall of the structure   SB2416- 7 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1Participating Residences      1.1 times the maximum blade tip2                              height of the wind tower to the3                              nearest point on the outside4                              wall of the structure 5Nonparticipating Residences   2.1 times the maximum blade tip6                              height of the wind tower to the7                              nearest point on the outside8                              wall of the structure 9Boundary Lines of             None10Participating Property  11Boundary Lines of             1.1 times the maximum blade tip12Nonparticipating Property     height of the wind tower to the13                              nearest point on the property14                              line of the nonparticipating15                              property 16Public Road Rights-of-Way     1.1 times the maximum blade tip17                              height of the wind tower18                              to the center point of the19                              public road right-of-way 20Overhead Communication and    1.1 times the maximum blade tip21Electric Transmission         height of the wind tower to the  SB2416- 8 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1and Distribution Facilities   nearest edge of the property2(Not Including Overhead       line, easement, or 3Utility Service Lines to      right-of-way 4Individual Houses or          containing the overhead line5Outbuildings) 6Overhead Utility Service      None7Lines to Individual8Houses or Outbuildings 9Fish and Wildlife Areas       2.1 times the maximum blade10and Illinois Nature           tip height of the wind tower11Preserve Commission           to the nearest point on the12Protected Lands               property line of the fish and13                              wildlife area or protected14                              land15    This Section does not exempt or excuse compliance with 16    electric facility clearances approved or required by the 17    National Electrical Code, the The National Electrical 18    Safety Code, the Illinois Commerce Commission, and the 19    Federal Energy Regulatory Commission, and their designees 20    or successors; . 21        (2) a wind tower of a commercial wind energy facility 22    to be sited so that industry standard computer modeling 23    indicates that any occupied community building or 24    nonparticipating residence will not experience more than   SB2416- 9 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1    30 hours per year of shadow flicker under planned 2    operating conditions;3        (3) a commercial solar energy facility to be sited as 4    follows, with setback distances measured from the nearest 5    edge of any component of the facility:  6Setback Description           Setback Distance 7Occupied Community            150 feet from the nearest8Buildings and Dwellings on    point on the outside wall 9Nonparticipating Properties   of the structure 10Boundary Lines of             None11Participating Property     12Public Road Rights-of-Way     50 feet from the nearest13                              edge 14Boundary Lines of             50 feet to the nearest15Nonparticipating Property     point on the property16                              line of the nonparticipating17                              property 18        (4) a commercial solar energy facility to be sited so 19    that the facility's perimeter is enclosed by fencing 20    having a height of at least 6 feet and no more than 25   SB2416- 10 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1    feet; and 2        (5) a commercial solar energy facility to be sited so 3    that no component of a solar panel has a height of more 4    than 20 feet above ground when the solar energy facility's 5    arrays are at full tilt. 6    The requirements set forth in this subsection (e) may be 7waived subject to the written consent of the owner of each 8affected nonparticipating property.9    (e-5) Commercial solar energy facilities or commercial 10wind energy facilities shall be placed in zoning districts 11primarily intended for agricultural or manufacturing uses. 12    (f) A county may not set a sound limitation for wind towers 13in commercial wind energy facilities or any components in 14commercial solar energy facilities that is more restrictive 15than the sound limitations established by the Illinois 16Pollution Control Board under 35 Ill. Adm. Code Parts 900, 17901, and 910.18    (f-5) A county may designate commercial wind energy 19facilities and commercial solar energy facilities as permitted 20uses for certain zoning districts. 21    (g) A county may not place any restriction on the 22installation or use of a commercial wind energy facility or a 23commercial solar energy facility unless it adopts an ordinance 24that complies with this Section. A county may not establish 25siting standards for supporting facilities that preclude 26development of commercial wind energy facilities or commercial   SB2416- 11 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1solar energy facilities, unless the development is determined 2by the county, based evidence presented at a public hearing, 3to be detrimental to the public health, safety, or welfare of 4county residents or the development site or adjacent property 5consistent with the legal standard set forth in the Illinois 6Supreme Court case, La Salle National Bank of Chicago v. Cook 7County, 12 Ill. 2d 40(1957). 8    A request for siting approval or a special use permit for a 9commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy 10facility, or modification of an approved siting or special use 11permit, shall be approved if the request is in compliance with 12the standards and conditions imposed in this Act, the zoning 13ordinance adopted consistent with this Code, and the 14conditions imposed under State and federal statutes and 15regulations, and if the approval would not be invalid 16considering the following factors: . 17        (1) The uniformity with the existing uses and zoning 18    of nearby property.19        (2) The extent to which property values are diminished 20    by the particular zoning restrictions.21        (3) The extent to which the destruction of property 22    values promotes the health, safety, morals, or general 23    welfare of the public.24        (4) The relative gain to the public as compared to the 25    hardship imposed on the individual property owner.26        (5) The suitability of the property for the zoned   SB2416- 12 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1    purpose.2        (6) The length of time the property has been vacant as 3    zoned considered in the context of land development in the 4    area.5        (7) The care with which a community has planned its 6    land use development.7        (8) The community need for the proposed use. 8    (g-5) A county may not approve a request for siting 9approval or a special use permit for a commercial wind energy 10facility or a commercial solar energy facility or modification 11of an approved siting or special use permit, if the proposal 12shall disturb more than one acre of land, unless the facility 13owner has obtained a National Pollution Discharge Elimination 14System ("NPDES") permit from the Illinois Environmental 15Protection Agency. 16    (h) A county may not adopt zoning regulations that 17disallow, permanently or temporarily, commercial wind energy 18facilities or commercial solar energy facilities from being 19developed or operated in any district zoned to allow 20agricultural or industrial uses. 21    (h-5) A county may deny a request for a special use permit 22for a commercial solar energy facility or commercial wind 23energy facility in areas planned for residential development 24by either a county comprehensive plan or a municipal 25comprehensive plan. 26    (i) A county may not require permit application fees for a   SB2416- 13 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1commercial wind energy facility or commercial solar energy 2facility that are unreasonable. All application fees imposed 3by the county shall be consistent with fees for projects in the 4county with similar capital value and cost. 5    (j) A county may set forth standards for construction, 6repair, decommissioning, or deconstruction of a commercial 7wind energy facility or commercial solar energy facility 8within its boundaries. Any Except as otherwise provided in 9this Section, a county shall not require standards for 10construction, repair, decommissioning, or deconstruction of a 11commercial wind energy facility or commercial solar energy 12facility imposed by a county must satisfy the minimum 13standards set forth or related financial assurances that are 14more restrictive than those included in the Department of 15Agriculture's standard wind farm agricultural impact 16mitigation agreement, template 81818, or standard solar 17agricultural impact mitigation agreement, version 8.19.19, as 18applicable and in effect on December 31, 2022, or the most 19recent version of the mitigation agreements if any subsequent 20version has been adopted after December 31, 2022. The amount 21of any decommissioning payment shall be in accordance with the 22financial assurance required by this Section those 23agricultural impact mitigation agreements. 24    (j-5) Each A commercial wind energy facility or a 25commercial solar energy facility shall require file a farmland 26drainage plan approved by with the county and impacted   SB2416- 14 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1drainage districts that outlines outlining how surface and 2subsurface drainage of farmland will be restored during and 3following construction or deconstruction of the facility. The 4plan is to be created by an independent consultant, selected 5by the county, and paid for independently by the facility 6developer and shall include the location of any potentially 7impacted drainage district facilities to the extent this 8information is publicly available from the county or the 9drainage district, plans to repair any subsurface drainage 10affected during construction or deconstruction using 11procedures outlined in the agricultural impact mitigation 12agreement entered into by the commercial wind energy facility 13owner or commercial solar energy facility owner, and 14procedures for the repair and restoration of surface drainage 15affected during construction or deconstruction. All surface 16and subsurface damage shall be repaired as soon as reasonably 17practicable. The county and impacted drainage districts shall 18complete review of the farmland drainage plan within 60 days 19after submission of the plan to the county. Upon completion of 20review, the county and impacted drainage districts shall issue 21a written determination to the facility developer either 22approving the plan or specifically identifying the reason for 23denial of the plan. 24    (j-10) In accordance with the Renewable Energy Facilities 25Agricultural Impact Mitigation Act, a facility owner shall 26provide the county in which a commercial solar energy facility   SB2416- 15 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1or commercial wind energy facility to be located, a 2deconstruction plan that has been prepared by a professional 3engineer, as defined in Section 10 of the Renewable Energy 4Facilities Agricultural Impact Mitigation Act, who has been 5selected by the facility owner. The deconstruction plan shall 6contain information that satisfies each of the components of 7deconstruction as set forth in the definition of 8"deconstruction" and "deconstruction plan" and in the 9construction and deconstruction standards and policies of the 10Department of Agriculture's standard wind farm agricultural 11impact mitigation agreement, template 81818, or standard solar 12agricultural impact mitigation agreement, version 8.19.19, as 13applicable and in effect on December 31, 2022, or the most 14recent version of the mitigation agreements if any subsequent 15version has been adopted after December 31, 2022. The county 16shall have its own professional engineer review the 17deconstruction plan and either approve or reject the 18deconstruction plan within 60 days after a complete submittal. 19If the deconstruction plan is rejected, the county shall 20provide a written statement of the specific reasons for 21rejection. The facility owner may file a revised 22deconstruction plan that addresses the specific reasons that 23led to the rejection of the deconstruction plan. The county 24shall review and act on any revised deconstruction plan within 2530 days after it is resubmitted. The facility owner shall 26reevaluate the estimated costs of deconstruction of any   SB2416- 16 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1facility after the fifth anniversary, and every 5 years 2thereafter, of the commercial operation date. The facility 3owner shall file with the county on or before the end of the 4fifth year of commercial operation, and then every fifth year 5thereafter, for approval by the county, an updated 6deconstruction plan prepared by a professional engineer who 7has been selected by the county. Based on an initial 8evaluation or reevaluation during the county approval process, 9the county may require changes in the level of financial 10assurance used to calculate the financial assurance level 11described in this Section required from the facility owner. If 12the county is unable to perform, to its satisfaction, the 13investigations of the content of the deconstruction plan 14necessary to approve the deconstruction plan filed by the 15facility owner, then the county and facility may mutually 16agree on the selection of a professional engineer independent 17of the facility owner to conduct any necessary investigations 18of the content of the deconstruction plan necessary to approve 19the deconstruction plan. The facility owner shall be 20responsible for the cost of the preparation of the 21deconstruction plan by its professional engineer or any 22independent professional engineer and the cost of any plan 23reviews by the professional engineer selected by the county. A 24commercial solar energy facility owner or commercial wind 25energy facility owner shall provide the county with an 26appropriate financial assurance mechanism consistent with the   SB2416- 17 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1financial requirements of this subsection, which shall be set 2forth in the Department of Agriculture's standard wind farm 3agricultural impact mitigation agreement, template 81818, or 4standard solar agricultural impact mitigation agreement, 5version 8.19.19, as applicable and in effect on December 31, 62022, or the most recent version of the mitigation agreements 7if any subsequent version has been adopted after December 31, 82022. The financial assurance shall be sufficient to cover the 9estimated costs of public safety or emergency repairs to the 10facility if damage to the facility caused by natural disaster 11or by operational malfunction, and the estimated costs of 12repairs the deconstruction of the facility in the event of 13abandonment of a commercial wind energy facility or 14abandonment of a commercial solar energy facility, as defined 15in Section 10 of the Renewable Energy Facilities Agricultural 16Impact Mitigation Act. The facility owner shall provide the 17county with the initial financial assurance to cover 100% of 18the estimated deconstruction costs prior to the commercial 19operation date. A county may use the financial assurance 20provided by the facility owner to cover public safety or 21emergency repairs that are not timely addressed by the 22facility owner, as determined by the county's designated 23representative. In the event that a county must use a portion 24of the financial assurance to address any public safety or 25emergency repairs or to deconstruct a portion of the facility, 26the facility owner shall replenish the financial assurance for   SB2416- 18 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1the amount used within 60 days after the expenditure of the 2financial assurance consistent with the Department's standard 3agricultural impact mitigation agreement. The purpose of the 4financial assurance shall be for and to assure deconstruction 5in the event of an abandonment of a commercial solar energy 6facility or commercial wind energy facility or to cover the 7estimated costs of public safety or emergency repairs to the 8facility in the event of damage to the facility caused by 9natural disaster or operational malfunction. 10    (k) A county may not condition approval of a commercial 11wind energy facility or commercial solar energy facility on a 12property value guarantee and may not require a facility owner 13to pay into a neighboring property devaluation escrow account. 14    (l) A county may require certain vegetative screening 15surrounding a commercial wind energy facility or commercial 16solar energy facility but may not require earthen berms or 17similar structures, except that a county may require earth 18berms for ground-based commercial solar energy projects and 19may adopt regulations governing the construction and 20maintenance of such earth berms. 21    (m) A county may set blade tip height limitations for wind 22towers in commercial wind energy facilities but may not set a 23blade tip height limitation that is more restrictive than the 24height allowed under a Determination of No Hazard to Air 25Navigation by the Federal Aviation Administration under 14 CFR 26Part 77.  SB2416- 19 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1    (n) A county may require that a commercial wind energy 2facility owner or commercial solar energy facility owner 3provide:4        (1) the results and recommendations from consultation 5    with the Illinois Department of Natural Resources that are 6    obtained through the Ecological Compliance Assessment Tool 7    (EcoCAT) or a comparable successor tool; and8        (2) the results of the United States Fish and Wildlife 9    Service's Information for Planning and Consulting 10    environmental review or a comparable successor tool that 11    is consistent with (i) the "U.S. Fish and Wildlife 12    Service's Land-Based Wind Energy Guidelines" and (ii) any 13    applicable United States Fish and Wildlife Service solar 14    wildlife guidelines that have been subject to public 15    review. 16    (o) A county may require a commercial wind energy facility 17or commercial solar energy facility to adhere to the 18recommendations provided by the Illinois Department of Natural 19Resources in an EcoCAT natural resource review report under 17 20Ill. Adm. Code Part 1075. 21    (p) A county may require a facility owner to:22        (1) demonstrate avoidance of protected lands as 23    identified by the Illinois Department of Natural Resources 24    and the Illinois Nature Preserve Commission; or25        (2) consider the recommendations of the Illinois 26    Department of Natural Resources for setbacks from   SB2416- 20 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1    protected lands, including areas identified by the 2    Illinois Nature Preserve Commission.3    (q) A county may require that a facility owner provide 4evidence of consultation with the Illinois State Historic 5Preservation Office to assess potential impacts on 6State-registered historic sites under the Illinois State 7Agency Historic Resources Preservation Act. 8    (r) To maximize community benefits, including, but not 9limited to, reduced stormwater runoff, flooding, and erosion 10at the ground mounted solar energy system, improved soil 11health, and increased foraging habitat for game birds, 12songbirds, and pollinators, a county may (1) require a 13commercial solar energy facility owner to plant, establish, 14and maintain for the life of the facility vegetative ground 15cover, consistent with the goals of the Pollinator-Friendly 16Solar Site Act and (2) require the submittal of a vegetation 17management plan that is in compliance with the agricultural 18impact mitigation agreement in the application to construct 19and operate a commercial solar energy facility in the county 20if the vegetative ground cover and vegetation management plan 21comply with the requirements of the underlying agreement with 22the landowner or landowners where the facility will be 23constructed. 24    No later than 90 days after January 27, 2023 (the 25effective date of Public Act 102-1123), the Illinois 26Department of Natural Resources shall develop guidelines for   SB2416- 21 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1vegetation management plans that may be required under this 2subsection for commercial solar energy facilities. The 3guidelines must include guidance for short-term and long-term 4property management practices that provide and maintain native 5and non-invasive naturalized perennial vegetation to protect 6the health and well-being of pollinators. 7    (s) If a facility owner enters into a road use agreement 8with the Illinois Department of Transportation, a road 9district, or other unit of local government relating to a 10commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy 11facility, the road use agreement shall require the facility 12owner to be responsible for (i) the reasonable cost of 13improving roads used by the facility owner to construct the 14commercial wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy 15facility and (ii) the reasonable cost of repairing roads used 16by the facility owner during construction of the commercial 17wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy facility 18so that those roads are in a condition that is safe for the 19driving public after the completion of the facility's 20construction. Roadways improved in preparation for and during 21the construction of the commercial wind energy facility or 22commercial solar energy facility shall be repaired and 23restored to the improved condition at the reasonable cost of 24the developer if the roadways have degraded or were damaged as 25a result of construction-related activities.26    The road use agreement shall not require the facility   SB2416- 22 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1owner to pay costs, fees, or charges for road work that is not 2specifically and uniquely attributable to the construction of 3the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial solar 4energy facility. Road-related fees, permit fees, or other 5charges imposed by the Illinois Department of Transportation, 6a road district, or other unit of local government under a road 7use agreement with the facility owner shall be reasonably 8related to the cost of administration of the road use 9agreement. 10    (s-5) The facility owner shall also compensate landowners 11for crop losses or other agricultural damages resulting from 12damage to the drainage system caused by the construction of 13the commercial wind energy facility or the commercial solar 14energy facility. The commercial wind energy facility owner or 15commercial solar energy facility owner shall repair or pay for 16the repair of all damage to the subsurface drainage system 17caused by the construction of the commercial wind energy 18facility or the commercial solar energy facility in accordance 19with the agriculture impact mitigation agreement requirements 20for repair of drainage. The commercial wind energy facility 21owner or commercial solar energy facility owner shall repair 22or pay for the repair and restoration of surface drainage 23caused by the construction or deconstruction of the commercial 24wind energy facility or the commercial solar energy facility 25as soon as reasonably practicable. 26    (t) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a facility   SB2416- 23 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1owner with siting approval from a county to construct a 2commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy 3facility is authorized to cross or impact a drainage system, 4including, but not limited to, drainage tiles, open drainage 5ditches, culverts, and water gathering vaults, owned or under 6the control of a drainage district under the Illinois Drainage 7Code, if the facility owner has obtained prior approval of a 8farmland drainage plan approved by a county, the impacted 9drainage districts, or both the county and the impacted 10drainage district without obtaining prior agreement or 11approval from the drainage district in accordance with the 12farmland drainage plan required by subsection (j-5). 13    (u) The amendments to this Section adopted in Public Act 14102-1123 do not apply to: (1) an application for siting 15approval or for a special use permit for a commercial wind 16energy facility or commercial solar energy facility if the 17application was submitted to a unit of local government before 18January 27, 2023 (the effective date of Public Act 102-1123); 19(2) a commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar 20energy facility if the facility owner has submitted an 21agricultural impact mitigation agreement to the Department of 22Agriculture before January 27, 2023 (the effective date of 23Public Act 102-1123); or (3) a commercial wind energy or 24commercial solar energy development on property that is 25located within an enterprise zone certified under the Illinois 26Enterprise Zone Act, that was classified as industrial by the   SB2416- 24 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1appropriate zoning authority on or before January 27, 2023, 2and that is located within 4 miles of the intersection of 3Interstate 88 and Interstate 39. 4(Source: P.A. 102-1123, eff. 1-27-23; 103-81, eff. 6-9-23; 5103-580, eff. 12-8-23; revised 7-29-24.) 6    Section 15. The Renewable Energy Facilities Agricultural 7Impact Mitigation Act is amended by changing Sections 10 and 815 as follows: 9    (505 ILCS 147/10)10    Sec. 10. Definitions. As used in this Act: 11    "Abandonment of a commercial wind energy facility" means 12when deconstruction has not been completed within 18 months 13after the commercial wind energy facility reaches the end of 14its useful life. For purposes of this definition, a commercial 15wind energy facility will be presumed to have reached the end 16of its useful life if (1) no electricity is generated for a 17continuous period of 12 months and (2) the commercial wind 18energy facility owner fails, for a period of 6 consecutive 19months, to pay the landowner amounts owed in accordance with 20the underlying agreement.21    "Abandonment of a commercial solar energy facility" means 22when deconstruction has not been completed within 12 months 23after the commercial solar energy facility reaches the end of 24its useful life. For purposes of this definition, a commercial   SB2416- 25 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1solar energy facility shall be presumed to have reached the 2end of its useful life if the commercial solar energy facility 3owner fails, for a period of 6 consecutive months, to pay the 4landowner amounts owed in accordance with the underlying 5agreement. 6    "Agricultural impact mitigation agreement" means an 7agreement between the commercial wind energy facility owner or 8the commercial solar energy facility owner and the Department 9of Agriculture described in Section 15 of this Act. 10    "Commercial renewable energy facility" means a commercial 11wind energy facility or commercial solar energy facility as 12defined in this Act. 13    "Commercial solar energy facility" means a solar energy 14conversion facility equal to or greater than 500 kilowatts in 15total nameplate capacity, including a solar energy conversion 16facility seeking an extension of a permit to construct granted 17by a county or municipality before the effective date of this 18amendatory Act of the 100th General Assembly. "Commercial 19solar energy facility" does not include a solar energy 20conversion facility: (1) for which a permit to construct has 21been issued before the effective date of this amendatory Act 22of the 100th General Assembly; (2) that is located on land 23owned by the commercial solar energy facility owner; (3) that 24was constructed before the effective date of this amendatory 25Act of the 100th General Assembly; or (4) that is located on 26the customer side of the customer's electric meter and is   SB2416- 26 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1primarily used to offset that customer's electricity load and 2is limited in nameplate capacity to less than or equal to 2,000 3kilowatts. 4    "Commercial solar energy facility owner" means a private 5commercial enterprise that owns a commercial solar energy 6facility. A commercial solar energy facility owner is not nor 7shall it be deemed to be a public utility as defined in the 8Public Utilities Act.9    "Commercial wind energy facility" means a wind energy 10conversion facility of equal or greater than 500 kilowatts in 11total nameplate generating capacity. "Commercial wind energy 12facility" includes a wind energy conversion facility seeking 13an extension of a permit to construct granted by a county or 14municipality before the effective date of this Act. 15"Commercial wind energy facility" does not include a wind 16energy conversion facility: (1) that has submitted a complete 17permit application to a county or municipality and for which 18the hearing on the completed application has commenced on the 19date provided in the public hearing notice, which must be 20before the effective date of this Act; (2) for which a permit 21to construct has been issued before the effective date of this 22Act; or (3) that was constructed before the effective date of 23this Act.24    "Commercial wind energy facility owner" means a private 25commercial enterprise that owns or operates a commercial wind 26energy facility. A commercial wind energy facility owner is   SB2416- 27 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1not nor shall it be deemed to be a public utility as defined in 2the Public Utilities Act. 3    "Construction" means the installation, preparation for 4installation, or repair of a commercial renewable energy 5facility. 6    "County" means the county where the commercial renewable 7energy facility is located. 8    "Deconstruction" means the removal of a commercial 9renewable energy facility from the property of a landowner and 10the restoration of that property as provided in the 11agricultural impact mitigation agreement. 12    "Department" means the Department of Agriculture. 13    "Financial assurance" means a reclamation or surety bond, 14including both performance bond obligations and payment bond 15obligations or an irrevocable letter of credit or other 16commercially available financial assurance that is acceptable 17to the county, with the county or landowner as beneficiary. 18    "Landowner" means any person (1) with an ownership 19interest in property that is used for agricultural purposes 20and (2) that is a party to an underlying agreement. 21    "Underlying agreement" means the written agreement with a 22landowner, including, but not limited to, an easement, option, 23lease, or license, under the terms of which another person has 24constructed, constructs, or intends to construct a commercial 25wind energy facility or commercial solar energy facility on 26the property of the landowner.  SB2416- 28 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1(Source: P.A. 99-132, eff. 7-24-15; 100-598, eff. 6-29-18.) 2    (505 ILCS 147/15)3    Sec. 15. Agricultural impact mitigation agreement. 4    (a) A commercial renewable energy facility owner of a 5commercial wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy 6facility that is located on landowner property shall enter 7into an agricultural impact mitigation agreement with the 8Department outlining construction and deconstruction standards 9and policies designed to preserve the integrity of any 10agricultural land that is impacted by commercial renewable 11energy facility construction and deconstruction. The 12construction and deconstruction of any commercial solar energy 13facility shall be in conformance with the Department's 14standard agricultural impact mitigation agreement referenced 15in subsection (f) of this Section and any additional standards 16set forth by the county in which the facility is to be located 17in accordance with subsection (j) of Section 5-12020 of the 18Counties Code. Except as provided in subsection (a-5) of this 19Section, the terms and conditions of the Department's standard 20agricultural impact mitigation agreement are subject to and 21may be modified by an underlying agreement between the 22landowner and the commercial solar energy facility owner. 23    (a-5) Prior to the commencement of construction, a 24commercial renewable energy facility owner of a commercial 25wind energy facility or a commercial solar energy facility   SB2416- 29 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1owner shall submit to the county in which the commercial solar 2facility is to be located a deconstruction plan that has been 3prepared by a professional engineer, as defined in Section 10 4of the Renewable Energy Facilities Agricultural Impact 5Mitigation Act, who has been selected by the facility owner. 6The deconstruction plan shall contain information that 7satisfies each of the components of deconstruction as set 8forth in the definition of "deconstruction" and 9"deconstruction plan" and in the construction and 10deconstruction standards and policies of the Department of 11Agriculture's standard wind farm agricultural impact 12mitigation agreement, template 81818, or standard solar 13agricultural impact mitigation agreement, version 8.19.19, as 14applicable and in effect on December 31, 2022, or the most 15recent version of the mitigation agreements if any subsequent 16version has been adopted after December 31, 2022. The county 17shall have its own professional engineer review the 18deconstruction plan and either approve or reject the 19deconstruction plan within 60 days after a complete submittal. 20If the deconstruction plan is rejected, the county shall 21provide a written statement of the specific reasons for 22rejection. The facility owner may file a revised 23deconstruction plan that addresses the specific reasons that 24led to the rejection of the deconstruction plan. The county 25shall review and act on any revised deconstruction plan within 2630 days after it is resubmitted. The facility owner shall   SB2416- 30 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1reevaluate the estimated costs of deconstruction of any 2facility after the fifth anniversary, and every 5 years 3thereafter, of the commercial operation date. The facility 4owner shall file with the county on or before the end of the 5fifth year of commercial operation, and then every fifth year 6thereafter, for approval by the county an updated 7deconstruction plan prepared by a professional engineer who 8has been selected by the county. Based on any initial 9evaluation or reevaluation during the county approval process, 10the county may require changes in the level of financial 11assurance used to calculate the financial assurance level 12described in this Section required from the facility owner. If 13the county is unable to perform, to its satisfaction, the 14investigations of the content of the deconstruction plan 15necessary to approve the deconstruction plan filed by the 16facility owner, then the county and facility may mutually 17agree on the selection of a professional engineer independent 18of the facility owner to conduct any necessary investigations 19of the content of the deconstruction plan necessary to approve 20the deconstruction plan. The facility owner shall be 21responsible for the cost of the preparation of the 22deconstruction plan by its professional engineer or any 23independent professional engineer and the cost of any plan 24reviews by the professional engineer selected by the county. A 25commercial solar energy facility owner shall provide the 26county with an appropriate financial assurance mechanism   SB2416- 31 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1consistent with the financial requirements set forth in this 2subsection, which shall be set forth in the Department of 3Agriculture's Department's standard wind farm agricultural 4impact mitigation agreement, template 81818, or standard solar 5agricultural impact mitigation agreement, version 8.19.19 6applicable and in effect on December 31, 2022, or the most 7recent version of the mitigation agreements if any subsequent 8version have been adopted after December 31, 2022. The 9financial assurance shall be sufficient to cover the estimated 10costs of public safety or emergency repairs to the facility in 11the event of damage to the facility caused by natural disaster 12or by operational malfunction and the estimated costs of 13repairs the deconstruction of the facility in the event of 14abandonment of the facility, as defined in Section 10 of the 15Renewable Energy Facilities Agricultural Impact Mitigation 16Act. The facility owner shall provide the county with the 17initial financial assurance to cover 100% of the estimated 18deconstruction costs prior to the commercial operation date. A 19county may use the financial assurance provided by the 20facility owner to cover public safety or emergency repairs 21that are not timely addressed by the facility owner, as 22determined by the county's designated representative. In the 23event that a county must use a portion of the financial 24assurance to address any public safety or emergency repairs or 25to deconstruct a portion of the facility. The facility owner 26shall replenish the financial assurance for the amount used   SB2416- 32 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1within 60 days after the expenditure of the financial 2assurance. The purpose of the financial assurance shall be for 3and to assure deconstruction in the event of an abandonment of 4a commercial solar energy facility or commercial wind energy 5facility or to cover the estimated costs of public safety or 6emergency repairs to the facility in the event of damage to the 7facility caused by natural disaster or by operational 8malfunction. 9    (b) The agricultural impact mitigation agreement for a 10commercial wind energy facility shall include, but is not 11limited to, such items as restoration of agricultural land 12affected by construction, deconstruction (including upon 13abandonment of a commercial wind energy facility), public 14safety or emergency repairs to the facility in the event of 15damage to the facility caused by natural disaster or by 16operational malfunction, construction staging, and storage 17areas; support structures; aboveground facilities; guy wires 18and anchors; underground cabling depth; topsoil replacement; 19protection and repair of agricultural drainage tiles; rock 20removal; repair of compaction and rutting; land leveling; 21prevention of soil erosion; repair of damaged soil 22conservation practices; compensation for damages to private 23property; clearing of trees and brush; interference with 24irrigation systems; access roads; weed control; pumping of 25water from open excavations; advance notice of access to 26private property; indemnification of landowners; and   SB2416- 33 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1deconstruction plans and financial assurance for 2deconstruction (including upon abandonment of a commercial 3wind energy facility) and for public safety or emergency 4repairs to the facility in the event of damage to the facility 5caused by natural disaster or by operational malfunction. 6    (b-5) The agricultural impact mitigation agreement for a 7commercial solar energy facility shall include, but is not 8limited to, such items as restoration of agricultural land 9affected by construction, deconstruction (including upon 10abandonment of a commercial solar energy facility); to cover 11the estimated costs of public safety or emergency repairs to 12the facility in the event of damage to the facility caused by 13natural disaster or by operational malfunction; support 14structures; aboveground facilities; guy wires and anchors; 15underground cabling depth; topsoil removal and replacement; 16rerouting and permanent repair of agricultural drainage tiles; 17rock removal; repair of compaction and rutting; construction 18during wet weather; land leveling; prevention of soil erosion; 19repair of damaged soil conservation practices; compensation 20for damages to private property; clearing of trees and brush; 21access roads; weed control; advance notice of access to 22private property; indemnification of landowners; and 23deconstruction plans and financial assurance for 24deconstruction (including upon abandonment of a commercial 25solar energy facility) and for public safety or emergency 26repairs to the facility in the event of damage to the facility   SB2416- 34 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1caused by natural disaster or by operational malfunction. The 2commercial solar energy facility owner shall enter into one 3agricultural impact mitigation agreement for each commercial 4solar energy facility. 5    (c) For commercial wind energy facility owners seeking a 6permit from a county or municipality for the construction of a 7commercial wind energy facility, the agricultural impact 8mitigation agreement shall be entered into prior to the public 9hearing required prior to a siting decision of a county or 10municipality regarding the commercial wind energy facility. 11The agricultural impact mitigation agreement is binding on any 12subsequent commercial wind energy facility owner that takes 13ownership of the commercial wind energy facility that is the 14subject of the agreement. 15    (c-5) A commercial solar energy facility owner shall, not 16less than 45 days prior to commencement of actual 17construction, submit to the Department a standard agricultural 18impact mitigation agreement as referenced in subsection (f) of 19this Section signed by the commercial solar energy facility 20owner and including all information required by the 21Department. The commercial solar energy facility owner shall 22provide either a copy of that submitted agreement or a copy of 23the fully executed project-specific agricultural impact 24mitigation agreement to the landowner not less than 30 days 25prior to the commencement of construction. The agricultural 26impact mitigation agreement is binding on any subsequent   SB2416- 35 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1commercial solar energy facility owner that takes ownership of 2the commercial solar energy facility that is the subject of 3the agreement. 4    (d) If a commercial renewable energy facility owner seeks 5an extension of a permit granted by a county or municipality 6for the construction of a commercial wind energy facility 7prior to the effective date of this Act, the agricultural 8impact mitigation agreement shall be entered into prior to a 9decision by the county or municipality to grant the permit 10extension. 11    (e) The Department may adopt rules that are necessary and 12appropriate for the implementation and administration of 13agricultural impact mitigation agreements as required under 14this Act. 15    (f) The Department shall make available on its website a 16standard agricultural impact mitigation agreement applicable 17to all commercial solar energy facilities within 60 days after 18the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 100th General 19Assembly. The standard agricultural impact mitigation 20agreements shall be amended as needed to conform with the 21financial assurance procedures and requirements under 22subsection (j-10) of Section 5-12020 of the Counties Code. 23    (g) Nothing in this amendatory Act of the 100th General 24Assembly and nothing in an agricultural impact mitigation 25agreement shall be construed to apply to or otherwise impair 26an underlying agreement for a commercial solar energy facility   SB2416- 36 -LRB104 12236 RTM 22343 b1entered into prior to the effective date of this amendatory 2Act of the 100th General Assembly. 3(Source: P.A. 99-132, eff. 7-24-15; 100-598, eff. 6-29-18.)